pl.aff
FLAG long
SFX f1 Y 48
SFX f1   a         i         [^jkłnrtw]a
SFX f1   a         0         ja
SFX f1   ka        ek        [^s]ka
SFX f1   a         0         ska
SFX f1   ła        eł        ła
SFX f1   na        en        na
SFX f1   obra      óbr       obra
SFX f1   a         0         ora
SFX f1   a         0         [^ęo]ta
SFX f1   ota       ót        ota
SFX f1   ęta       ąt        ęta
SFX f1   wa        ew        rwa
SFX f1   a         0         twa
SFX f1   e         y         [^cijl]e
SFX f1   ce        ec        [^e]lce
SFX f1   e         0         elce
SFX f1   ce        iec       pce
SFX f1   e         0         [aiy]ce
SFX f1   ce        iec       wce
SFX f1   e         i         [^bcnpz]ie
SFX f1   e         0         [bcpz]ie
SFX f1   e         0         nie
SFX f1   nie       ń         anie
SFX f1   e         i         [^aeioy]je
SFX f1   je        i         [aeo]je
SFX f1   e         0         [iy]je
SFX f1   e         i         le
SFX f1   i         0         gi
SFX f1   ki        ek        [^ćęińośuyź]ki
SFX f1   ćki       ciek      ćki
SFX f1   i         0         [ęiouy]ki
SFX f1   ńki       niek      ńki
SFX f1   y         0         [^bcdłtw]y
SFX f1   y         0         [^ę]by
SFX f1   ęby       ąb        ęby
SFX f1   cy        iec       cy
SFX f1   y         0         [^o]dy
SFX f1   y         0         [^w]ody
SFX f1   ody       ód        wody
SFX f1   y         0         [auy]ły
SFX f1   ły        eł        [dr]ły
SFX f1   oły       ół        doły
SFX f1   y         0         soły
SFX f1   y         0         [^o]ty
SFX f1   y         0         [^b]oty
SFX f1   oty       ót        boty
SFX f1   y         0         [^o]wy
SFX f1   owy       ów        owy
